apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON PROP_PÄIVY_MAL !!= @CODE@ päivy:päivä
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY ;
%<np%>: HUMAN-PROP-DERIVATION ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_PÄIVY !!= @CODE@ päivy:päivä
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY ;
LEXICON PROP-PLC_PÄIVY-PL
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY-PL ;


LEXICON PROP-PLC_KNIIGU !!= @CODE@ kniigu:kniiga
!! Gradation No (looks like it should have gradation)
!! Vowel Harmony Back
!! Stem Vowel u/a
!! Plural stem in oi
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KNIIGU ;

LEXICON PROP_MUARJU !!= @CODE@ muarju:muarja
!! Gradation NA
!! Vowel Harmony Back
!! Stem Vowel u:a
!! Plural stem in o
 PROP_MUARJU-SG ;
 PROP_MUARJU-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_MUARJU-SG
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_MUARJU-PL
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_MUARJU !!= @CODE@ muarju:muarja
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY ;
LEXICON PROP-PLC_MUARJU-PL
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_PIÄSTÄNDY !!= @CODE@ piäständy:piäständä
!! Gradation NA
!! Vowel Harmony Back
!! Stem Vowel u:a
!! Plural stem in o
 PROP_PIÄSTÄNDY-SG ;
 PROP_PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_PIÄSTÄNDY-SG
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_PIÄSTÄNDY-PL
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_PIÄSTÄNDY !!= @CODE@ piäständy:piäständä
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY ;
LEXICON PROP-PLC_PIÄSTÄNDY-PL
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_AKKU !!= @CODE@ akku:akka
!! Gradation Yes
!! Vowel Harmony Back
!! Stem Vowel u:a
!! Plural stem in o
 PROP_AKKU-SG ;
 PROP_AKKU-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_AKKU-SG
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_AKKU-SG ;
LEXICON PROP_AKKU-PL
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_AKKU-PL ;

LEXICON PROP-MAL_AKKU
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_AKKU ;
LEXICON PROP-PLC_AKKU
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_AKKU ;

LEXICON PROP_KOIVU !!= @CODE@ koivu:koivu
!! Back vowel
!! Gradation NA
!! Stem vowel u
!! Plural stem in loi
!! Can be merged with _RUNO
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY ;

LEXICON PROP_KOIVU_MAL !!= @CODE@ koivu:koivu
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KOIVU
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KOIVU/HERY ;

LEXICON PROP_RUNO !!= @CODE@ runo:runo
!! Back	vowel
!! Gradation NA
!! Stem vowel o
!! Plural stem in loi
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;
LEXICON PROP-PLC_RUNO !!= @CODE@ runo:runo
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;

LEXICON PROP_RUADO !!= @CODE@ ruado:ruado
!! Back vowel
!! Gradation Yes
!! Stem vowel o
!! Plural stem in loi
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_RUADO !!= @CODE@ ruado:ruado
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ ;

LEXICON PROP_KYNDÖ !!= @CODE@ kyndö:kyndö
!! Front vowel
!! Gradation Yes
!! Stem vowel o
!! Plural stem in loi
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KYNDÖ !!= @CODE@ kyndö:kyndö
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ ;

LEXICON PROP_VALGEI !!= @CODE@ 
!! Back	vowel
!! Gradation NA
  PROP_VALGEI-SG ;
  PROP_VALGEI-PL ;

LEXICON PROP_VALGEI-SG !!= @CODE@ 
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI-SG ;

LEXICON PROP_VALGEI-PL !!= @CODE@ 
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI-PL ;
LEXICON PROP-PLC_VALGEI !!= @CODE@ valgei:valge
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI ;




!! !TWO-SYLLABLE LEMMA THREE-SYLLABLE STEM

LEXICON PROP_KARJAL !!= @CODE@ karjal:karjal
!! Back vowel
!! Gradation NA
!! Singular stem vowel 0/a
!! Plural stem vowel o
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KARJAL ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KARJAL !!= @CODE@ karjal:karjal
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KARJAL ;

LEXICON PROP-MAL_KARJAL !!= @CODE@ 
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KARJAL ;

LEXICON PROP_KARJALAINE !!= @CODE@ karjalaine:karjala
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;
LEXICON PROP-PLC_KARJALAINE !!= @CODE@ karjalaine:karjala
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;

LEXICON PROP_KIELINE !!= @CODE@ kieline:kieli
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_NAINE/KIELINE ;
LEXICON PROP-PLC_KIELINE !!= @CODE@ kieline:kieli
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_NAINE/KIELINE ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_TVER !!= __@CODE@__ Tver:Tver
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_TVER ;

LEXICON PROP_TAIGIN
%<np%>:   NMN_TAIGIN  ;
LEXICON PROP-MAL_TAIGIN
%<np%>:   NMN_TAIGIN  ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_TAIGIN !!= __@CODE@__
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_TAIGIN  ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_TOVESTEH !!= __@CODE@__ tovesteh:tovesteh
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH ;
LEXICON PROP_TOVESTEH !!= __@CODE@__ tovesteh:tovesteh
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_PEREH !!= __@CODE@__ pereh:pereh
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH ;
LEXICON PROP_PEREH !!= __@CODE@__ pereh:pereh
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH ;

LEXICON	 PROP-PLC_VIDEL !!= __@CODE@__ videl:videl
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_VIDEL ;

LEXICON PROP_VIDEL !!= __@CODE@__ videl:videl
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_VIDEL ;

LEXICON PROP_RUS-IN_SUR
:a PROP_KALA_SURFEM     ;
%<np%>:   NMN_TAIGIN  ;

LEXICON PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR !! * @CODE@ Pavlovič:Pavlov
:na PROP_KALA_PATRFEM	;
%<np%>+Patr:ič   NMN_TAIGIN	;
 PROP_RUS-V_SUR ; 

LEXICON PROP_RUS-V_SUR
:a PROP_KALA_SURFEM	;
%<np%>:   NMN_ABRAMOV	;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_ALUS !!= @CODE@ Alus:Aluks
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES ;

LEXICON PROP_ALUS !!= @CODE@ Alus:Aluks
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KONDII
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;
LEXICON PROP_KONDII !!= @CODE@ kondii:kondi
%<np%>:%{back%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;

LEXICON PROP-PLC_STIPENDII
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;
LEXICON PROP_STIPENDII !!= @CODE@ kondii:kondi
%<np%>:%{front%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;

LEXICON HUMAN-PROP-DERIVATION
%-nimelline:%-#nimelli A_KIELINE ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Quantifier inflection
!  ---------------
!! Livvi quantifiers inflect for case.

LEXICON NUM_
%<FIXME%>%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM-STEMS
#yksi:#y%{front%} NUM_YKSI ;
#kaksi:#ka%{back%} NUM_KAKSI ;
#kolme:#kolm%{back%} NUM_KOLME ;
#nelli:#nell%{front%} NUM_NELLI ;
#viizi:#viid%{front%} NUM_VIIZI ;
#kuuzi:#kuud%{back%} NUM_KUUZI ;
#seiččie:#seičče%{front%} NUM_SEIČČIE ;
#kaheksa:#kaheksa%{back%} NUM_KAHEKSA ;
#yheksä:#yheksä%{front%} NUM_YHEKSÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_OZA
%<num%>%<card%>:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ ;
:%{back%} ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_MUARJU  !!= __@CODE@__ muarju:muarja
%<num%>%<card%>:%{back%} NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY ;
:%{back%} ORD_01_BACK ;

LEXICON NUM_SÄYNÄ
%<num%>%<card%>:%{front%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ ;

LEXICON NUM_SADA
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%<num%>%<card%>%<sg%>0:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%{back%}%^WGStem00 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%<num%>%<card%>%<sg%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%{back%}00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%<num%>%<card%>%<pl%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%{back%}%^WGStem0 NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%<num%>%<card%>%<pl%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%{back%}00 NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;

LEXICON NUM_YKSI  !!= @CODE@ yksi:y
%<num%>%<card%>: NMN_YKSI ;

LEXICON NUM_KAKSI  !!= @CODE@ kaksi:ka
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%<num%>%<card%>%<sg%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@ksi NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%<num%>%<card%>%<sg%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@h00 NUM-SG-PAR_tu ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%<num%>%<card%>%<sg%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@hte NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@%<num%>%<card%>%<sg%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.SG@hte NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%<num%>%<card%>%<pl%>0:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@htet NUM-NOM ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%<num%>%<card%>%<pl%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-PL-GEN_EN ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%<num%>%<card%>%<pl%>0:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksii NUM-PL-PAR_Zero ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%<num%>%<card%>%<pl%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-INS ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%<num%>%<card%>%<pl%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-USUALLY-WEAK ;
@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@%<num%>%<card%>%<pl%>:@U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@@U.DECL-NX.PL@ksi NUM-USUALLY-STRONG ;
:hte%^WGStem ORD_01_BACK ; !!= * @CODE@ This cannot be final
 

LEXICON Exceptions
kolmaskymmenes:kolma#kymmen NUM_  "kolmaskymmenes" ;
kolmassuas:kolma#sada NUM_  "kolmassadas" ;
kaheksastostu:kaheksastos NUM_  "kahdeksastoista" ;
tuhannes:tuhanne NUM_  "tuhannes" ;
Iisussu:Iisussa PROP_AKKU "" ;
LEXICON propernouns
Biblii%<n%>%<np%>:Bibli PROP_STIPENDII  "Raamattu" ;
Juakko%<n%>%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Juakko PROP_RUADO  "" ;
Anus%<n%>%<np%>:Anuks PROP_ALUS  "Aunus" ;
Bukin%<n%>%<np%>:Bukin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Dmitrijev%<n%>%<np%>:Dmitrijev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Fedulov%<n%>%<np%>:Fedulov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Genrihov%<n%>%<np%>:Genrihov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Gukkin%<n%>%<np%>:Gukkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Hristos%<n%>%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Hristos PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Hudilainen%<n%>%<np%>:Hudila PROP_KARJALAINE  "Hudilainen" ;
Iisus%<n%>%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Iisus PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Ivan%<n%>%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Ivan PROP_TAIGIN  "Ivan" ;
Jegorov%<n%>%<np%>:Jegorov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Jumal%<n%>%<np%>:Jumal PROP_TAIGIN  "" ;
Lʼovkin%<n%>%<np%>:Lʼovkin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Merkojev%<n%>%<np%>:Merkojev PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Mihnev%<n%>%<np%>:Mihnev PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
Nevvostoliitto%<n%>%<np%>:Nevvostoliitto PROP_RUADO  "Neuvostoliitto" ;
Santtu%<n%>%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:Santtu PROP_KOIVU  "Santtu" ;
Sidorov%<n%>%<np%>:Sidorov PROP_RUS-V_SUR  "" ;
Skomorošin%<n%>%<np%>:Skomorošin PROP_RUS-IN_SUR  "" ;
Viro%<n%>%<np%>:Viro PROP_RUNO  "Viro" ;
Vlasov%<n%>%<np%>:Vlasov PROP_RUS-VIČ_PATR  "" ;
LEXICON PROP_NEWWORDS
Aminadab:Aminadab PROP-MAL_KARJAL "" ;
Asur:Asur PROP-MAL_KARJAL "" ;
Elihud:Elihud PROP-MAL_KARJAL "" ;
Peres:Peres PROP-MAL_KARJAL "" ;
Gennadii:Gennadi PROP_KONDII ;
Mörgö:Mörgö PROP_KYNDÖ ;
Nipsu:Nipsu PROP_KOIVU "" ;
Muikkuine:Muikku PROP_KARJALAINE "" ;
Isakku:Isakka PROP-MAL_AKKU "" ;
Juudu:Juuda PROP-MAL_AKKU "" ;
ReAnimatsija-projektu:ReAnimatsija-projekta PROP_MUARJU ;
Družba-projektu:Družba-projekta PROP_MUARJU ;
Afriekku:Afriekka PROP_AKKU "" ;
Amierikku:Amierikka PROP_AKKU "" ;
Bolguarii:Bolguari PROP_KONDII "" ;
Jevrouppu:Jevrouppa PROP_AKKU "" ;
LEXICON propernouns-toponyms
Berlin%<n%>%<np%>:Berlinä PROP-PLC_TAIGIN  "Berliini" ;
Frantsii%<n%>%<np%>:Frantsi PROP-PLC_KONDII  "Ranska" ;
Irak%<n%>%<np%>:Iraka PROP-PLC_TAIGIN  "Irak" ;
Iran%<n%>%<np%>:Irana PROP-PLC_TAIGIN  "Iran" ;
Japounii%<n%>%<np%>:Japouni PROP-PLC_KONDII  "Japani" ;
Jessoilu%<n%>%<np%>:Jessoila PROP-PLC_MUARJU  "Jessoila" ;
Jevroupu%<n%>%<np%>:Jevroupa PROP-PLC_KNIIGU  "Eurooppa" ;
Kostamus%<n%>%<np%>:Kostamuks PROP-PLC_ALUS  "Kostamus" ;
Leningruadu%<n%>%<np%>:Leningruada PROP-PLC_KNIIGU  "Leningrad" ;
Litvu%<n%>%<np%>:Litva PROP-PLC_MUARJU  "Liettua" ;
Marokko%<n%>%<np%>:Marokko PROP-PLC_RUADO  "Marokko" ;
Meksikku%<n%>%<np%>:Meksikka PROP-PLC_AKKU  "Meksiko" ;
Monaako%<n%>%<np%>:Monaako PROP-PLC_RUADO  "Monaco" ;
Palestiinu%<n%>%<np%>:Palestiina PROP-PLC_MUARJU  "Palestiina" ;
Siirii%<n%>%<np%>:Siiri PROP-PLC_KONDII  "Syyria" ;
Tver%<n%>%<np%>:Tver PROP-PLC_TVER  "Tver" ;
Ukrainu%<n%>%<np%>:Ukraina PROP-PLC_MUARJU  "Ukraina" ;
Veškelys%<n%>%<np%>:Veškelyks PROP-PLC_ALUS  "Veskelys" ;
Yhtysvallat%<n%>%<np%>:Yhtys#valda PROP-PLC_MUARJU-PL  "Yhdysvallat" ;
Čeehii%<n%>%<np%>:Čeehi PROP-PLC_KONDII  "Tšekki" ;
Čičiliušku%<n%>%<np%>:Čičiliušku PROP-PLC_KOIVU  "Čičiliušku" ;
Izrail'u%<n%>%<np%>:Izrail'a PROP_MUARJU  "Istael" ;
Alavoine%<n%>%<np%>:Alavo PROP_KARJALAINE  "Alavoinen" ;
Alango%<n%>%<np%>:Alango PROP_RUNO  "Alango" ;
Anus%<n%>%<np%>:Anuks PROP_ALUS  "Aunus" ;
Argentiinu%<n%>%<np%>:Argentiina PROP_MUARJU  "Argentiina" ;
Espanii%<n%>%<np%>:Espani PROP_KONDII  "Espanja" ;
Hanti-Mansiisk%<n%>%<np%>:Hanti-Mansiisk PROP_KARJAL  "Hanti-Mansiisk" ;
Kesarii%<n%>%<np%>:Kesari PROP_KONDII  "Kesarea" ;
Korei%<n%>%<np%>:Kore PROP_VALGEI  "Korea" ;
Muuminotko%<n%>%<np%>:Muumi#notko PROP_RUNO  "Muumilaakso" ;
Mägeveh%<n%>%<np%>:Mägeveh PROP_PEREH  "Mägeveh" ;
Nannul%<n%>%<np%>:Nannul PROP_KARJAL  "Nannula" ;
Novokuznetsk%<n%>%<np%>:Novokuznetsk PROP_KARJAL  "Novokuznetsk" ;
Saransk%<n%>%<np%>:Saransk PROP_KARJAL  "Saransk" ;
Tartu%<n%>%<np%>:Tartu PROP_KOIVU  "Tartto" ;
Turku%<n%>%<np%>:Turku PROP_KOIVU  "Turku" ;
Varkaus%<n%>%<np%>:Varkauks PROP_ALUS  "Varkaus" ;
Videl%<n%>%<np%>:Videl PROP_VIDEL  "Vitele" ;
Ylä-Videl%<n%>%<np%>:Ylä-Videl PROP_VIDEL  "Ylä-Vitele" ;
Kuittine%<n%>%<np%>:Kuitti PROP_KIELINE  "Kuittinen" ;
